California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
(e) The department shall adopt, use, and require the homes to use uniform accounting procedures for the MWR Fund and the MWRO Funds subject to the department’s oversight and audit as needed. The department shall prepare an itemized report that is organized by category, including sufficient detail to allow legislative oversight, and accounts for all expenditures from, and all funds deposited into, the MWR Fund and the MWRO Funds for the previous fiscal year. The department shall submit the report on or before December 31, 2018, and annually on or before August 20 thereafter, to the following: 

(1) The Department of Finance.

(2) The fiscal committees of the Assembly and Senate.

(3) The committees of the Assembly and the Senate that have subject matter jurisdiction over veterans’ affairs.

(4) The Veterans’ Home Allied Council or the resident council of each home.

(5) The administrator of each home.

(f) The department shall maintain a reserve in the MWR Fund of not less than three million dollars ($3,000,000).

(g) The department may transfer funds from the MWR Fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code or may hire a third-party investment broker to invest moneys from the MWR Fund consistent with Section 16480.2 of the Government Code and any regulations regarding selecting prudent, approved investment types. The amount invested and the accrued interest or earnings shall be credited to the MWR Fund for allocation by the department.

(h) The administrator of a home may enter into an agreement with the Veterans’ Home Allied Council that authorizes the council to operate facilities and engage in activities that are authorized by subdivision (b). The agreement shall be in the form and manner specified by the administrator and in conformity with applicable California law and regulations, including, but not limited to, the state procurement and contracting process.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 424, Sec. 3.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1048.

(a) A Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Operating Fund (MWRO Fund) shall be maintained by the administrator of each home to administer quality of life activities for the general welfare of the members, pursuant to the annual allocation, including any augmentation provided by the secretary, from the MWR Fund.

(b) The annual allocations from the MWR Fund, including any augmentations provided by the secretary, and any other quality of life moneys received shall be deposited in a local bank account established for this purpose.

(c) Moneys in the MWRO Fund shall not be expended for the following:

(1) Medical treatment or medical care for a member.

(2) The maintenance or major capital improvement of the Home’s physical plant.

(3) A function, operation, or activity that is not directly related to the morale, welfare, or recreation of the members of the home.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 424, Sec. 5.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1049.

(a) Moneys in the Morale, Welfare, and Recreation Fund maintained under subdivision (a) of Section 1047 may be used, subject to approval by the secretary, to establish or operate a canteen and base exchange at each home location. The canteen may sell goods at a profit.

(b) The MWRO Fund of each home shall include proceeds from the operation of a canteen, or base exchange. Any moneys derived from golf course green fees, range ball fees, and operations of activities unique to each Veterans’ Home of California shall be deposited in the MWRO Fund allocation for that home after appropriate state costs, fees, and rent are deducted from the revenue received for those
 operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 424, Sec. 6.   (SB 543)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1050.

Veterans’ Home Allied Councils, which are established pursuant to the constitution of the Allied Council, Veterans’ Home of California, for each home, and which are composed of members of each home, are hereby recognized as established advisory bodies to the administrator of each home. Each Veterans’ Home Allied Council may also represent members who reside at the home for which the council was established in matters before the Legislature. In the course of providing that representation, each council shall comply with the following requirements:

(a) The council’s representation shall be approved by a majority of the voting members of the council.

(b) The council shall not engage in any campaign or endorse public candidates
 in connection with that representation.

(c) The council’s actions shall be in accordance with its constitution, bylaws, and policies and procedures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 84.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

(a) On or before January 1, 2019, the department shall create a transparent admissions and waiting list process for admission to the homes.

(b) On or before January 1, 2019, the department shall create a page on its internet website that does all of the following:

(1) Explains the application and waiting list process developed in subdivision (a), including an explanation of the process, laws, and regulations pertaining to admission, the wait list, and continuum of care.

(2) Allows online submission of applications.

(3) Provides a reasonable level of information to applicants about the projected wait time at each home for various levels of care, enhancing applicant’s ability to make long-term care planning decisions.

(4) Allows an applicant to check their current wait list status and overall application status.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 103.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1052.

(a) The master plan for the overall operation of the veterans’ homes system mandated by Provision 4 of Item 8955-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2017 (Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2017) shall, notwithstanding that provision, be prepared by the department no later than December 31, 2019, and shall be revised every five years thereafter.

(b) The master plan, in addition to the requirements of Provision 4 of Item 8955-001-0001, shall include consideration and discussion of all of the following elements:

(1) The locating of future facilities at or within the vicinity of United States Department of Veterans Affairs facilities.

(2) The locating of future facilities near existing veteran populations within the state or the use of smaller homes in a larger number of communities to allow veterans to age in place in their existing communities.

(3) Providing services through community-based care service delivery models.

(4) The closure of facilities.

(5) The expansion of existing facilities or conversion of existing facilities to provide different levels of service.

(6) The local area cost of living for employees at current and proposed facility locations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 38, Sec. 3.   (AB 1824)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Veterans Homes Planning Strategy [1070. - 1080.]

1070.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Department” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(b) “Home” means a veterans home located in Barstow, Chula Vista, Fresno, Lancaster, Redding, Ventura, West Los Angeles, or Yountville.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 1365)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1072.

(a) On or before February 1, 2019, the department shall submit to the Legislature and post in a prominent location on its Internet Web site in an accessible and searchable format a financial report that provides all of the following information regarding each home identified in subdivision (b) of Section 1070:

(1) The amount of state funds budgeted to and the amount of revenue collected from the home.

(2) The remaining amount of
 expected revenue from the home over a period of several years, as applicable.

(3) Aggregate costs of care per resident, segregated by level of care, for the home.

(4) Current maintenance costs of the home.

(5) Projected maintenance costs for the home.

(b) The department shall update the report required by subdivision (a) on or before
 February 1, 2020, and annually thereafter. The department shall submit to the Legislature and post on its Internet Web site each updated annual report in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 1365)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1074.

(a) The department periodically shall review the use of each home
 to determine the best continued, unrestricted use of the home. The department shall submit a report to the Legislature regarding this determination and post it in a prominent location on its internet website in an accessible and searchable format.

(b) In developing the report, the department shall review all of the following:

(1) Every financial report created pursuant to Section 1072 and released during the five previous years or since February 1, 2019, whichever is fewer.

(2) Current needs of the regional veterans population.

(3) Projections regarding the changing composition of the veterans population.

(4) Assessment of resources available to serve the projected veterans population.

(5) Input from veteran residents of the home, community members near the home, and other stakeholders.

(6) Any other factors the department determines are necessary to review to make the determination.

(c) The report for each home shall be due in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) The report for the Barstow home shall be due on or before December 31, 2026.

(2) The report for the Chula Vista home shall be due on or before December 31, 2025.

(3) The report for the Fresno home shall be due on or before December 31, 2028.

(4) The report for the Lancaster, Ventura, and West Los Angeles homes shall be due on or before December 31, 2025.

(5) The report for the Redding home shall be due on or before December 31, 2028.

(6) The report for the Yountville home shall be due on or before December 31, 2022.

(7) The report for any future home shall be due on or before December 31 of the fifteenth calendar year after the home admits its first resident or after the home is deeded to the department, whichever is later.

(d) The department shall update each report required by this section every five years. The department shall submit to the Legislature and post on its internet website each updated report in compliance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (SB 1435)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1075.

When the department reviews the use of each home to determine the best continued, unrestricted use of the home, pursuant to Section 1074, the department shall additionally assess all of the following:

(a) The need by residents of state veteran homes in accessing care at a Veterans Health Administration medical center.

(b) The need by nonresident veterans in the communities where state veteran homes are located in accessing care at a Veterans Health Administration medical center.

(c) The potential for the Veterans Health Administration to place satellite medical clinics on the state veteran home campuses to serve both residents of the veteran
 homes and nonresident veterans in the communities where state veteran homes are located. In making this assessment, the department shall meet and confer with officials of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs on the possibility of locating satellite clinics on state veteran home campuses.

(d) The potential for the Veterans Health Administration to place satellite medical clinics within a 30-minute drive of a state veteran home campus to serve both residents of the veteran homes and nonresident veterans in the communities where state veteran homes are located. In making this assessment, the department shall meet and confer with officials of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs on the possibility of locating satellite clinics within a 30-minute drive of a state veteran home campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 194, Sec. 1.   (SB 1195)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1078.

The department shall submit each report to the Legislature required by this chapter in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 1365)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1080.

This chapter shall not be deemed to require or authorize the disclosure of personal or medical information otherwise prohibited or restricted from disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   (AB 1365)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Veterans’ Homes Bond Act of 2000 [1100. - 1117.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1100. - 1102.]

1100.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Veterans’ Homes Bond Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1102.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs designated in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 1108.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Home Finance Committee created pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1108.

(c) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Home Fund created pursuant to Section 1103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Veterans’ Homes [1103. - 1104.2.]

1103.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Home Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.

(a) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, money in the fund shall be used by the Department of Veterans Affairs for the purpose of designing and constructing veterans’ homes in California and completing a comprehensive renovation of the Veterans’ Home at Yountville. Funding from this bond shall be allocated to fund the state’s matching requirement to construct or renovate those veterans’ homes in Section 1011 first, and then fund any additional homes established under this section. These homes shall be in addition to sites authorized under Section 1011.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, construction contracts awarded for veterans’ homes shall have a statewide participation goal of not less than 3 percent for disabled veteran business enterprises, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the Veterans’ Home Fund established by Section 1103 are, subject to the limit set forth in subdivision (b), hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, for the funding of the state’s matching requirement for the design, equipping, and construction of all of the following:

(1) The Veterans’ Home of California, Lancaster, as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1011.

(2) The Veterans’ Home of California, Saticoy, as described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 1011.

(3) The Veterans’ Home of California, West Los Angeles, as provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 1104.

(b) The total amount appropriated in accordance with subdivision (a) may not exceed the sum of thirty-one million dollars ($31,000,000).

(c) The homes specified in subdivision (a) may care for veterans with substance abuse disorders.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, in addition to the funds appropriated pursuant to this section, the federal matching funds available pursuant to the State Veterans’ Home Assistance Improvement Act of 1977 (38 U.S.C. Sec. 8131 et seq.) are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, for the purpose of design, equipping, construction, renovation of, or expansion or repayment of any loan related to the projects specified in this section.

(e) Subject to approval of the Department of Finance, the Department of Veterans Affairs may expend state funds pursuant to this section for the design of projects specified in this section in anticipation of the receipt of federal matching funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 237, Sec. 3.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1104.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, an amount, not to exceed the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000), is hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, from the Veterans’ Home Fund to the Department of Veterans Affairs, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, for the state’s matching share for the design, construction, equipping, and renovation of the Veterans’ Home of California, Yountville, as described in Section 1011.

(b) Excluding any funds required to pay for costs associated with issuing and administering general obligation bonds, any remaining general obligation bond funds available in the Veterans’ Home Fund created under Section 1103 after funding the design, construction, equipping, expansion, or renovation of the Lancaster, Saticoy, West Los Angeles, or Yountville veterans homes, as specified in Section 1104.1 and subdivision (a), and projects funded through any Budget Act, are, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years to the Department of Veterans Affairs, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, to fund the state’s matching share for renovations, design, construction, and equipping at Yountville consistent with the purposes established in subdivision (a) of Section 1104.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, in addition to the funds appropriated pursuant to this section, the federal matching funds available pursuant to the State Veterans’ Home Assistance Improvement Act of 1977 (38 U.S.C. Sec. 8131 et seq.), are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance, for the purpose of design, construction, equipping, renovation of, or expansion or repayment of any loan related to, the projects specified in this section.

(d) Subject to approval of the Department of Finance, the Department of Veterans Affairs may expend state funds pursuant to this section for the design of projects specified in this section in anticipation of the receipt of federal matching funds.

(e) The Department of Veterans Affairs shall prepare and submit a report to the Legislature and Governor semiannually, beginning on March 1, 2005, on the progress of the acquisition, design, equipping, construction, establishment, and expansion of the veterans’ homes specified in Section 15819.60 of the Government Code, including updated cost estimates and a synopsis on the efficacy of the design-build procurement process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [1105. - 1117.]

1105.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Veterans’ Home Fund, created by Section 1103.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1106.

Bonds in the total amount of forty-nine million twenty-five thousand dollars ($49,025,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 1130, or as much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes of this chapter, and to be used and sold for carrying out the purposes of Section 1104, and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall constitute a valid and binding obligation of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 15.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1108.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Veterans’ Home Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Veterans’ Home Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Treasurer, the Controller, the Director of Finance, and the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, or their designated representatives. The Treasurer shall serve as chairperson of the committee. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the Department of Veterans Affairs is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1109.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in this chapter and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1110.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds maturing each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 1112 appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

The Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amount withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, plus an amount equal to the interest that the money would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

The Department of Veterans Affairs may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee, by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The department shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the department in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1114.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1115.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, which is a part of the State General Obligation Bond Law. Approval by the voters of the state for the issuance of the bonds described in this chapter includes the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued under this chapter or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1116.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or the State General Obligation Bond Law, if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this chapter that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and the investment earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or to take any other action with respect to the investment and use of bond proceeds required or desirable under federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1117.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 16 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. County Institutions [1120. - 1121.]

1120.

Any county may provide and maintain a home for veteran soldiers, sailors, airmen, guardians, and marines who have served the United States honorably in any of its wars.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 17.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1121.

For the purposes of this chapter the board of supervisors of any county may:

(a) Purchase, receive by donation, condemn, lease, or otherwise acquire real and personal property necessary for such home, and improve, preserve, manage, and control the same.

(b) Purchase, construct, lease, furnish, and repair buildings for such home and provide the necessary custodians, employees, attendants, and supplies for its proper maintenance.

(c) Levy a special tax pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code, and spend the proceeds for the purposes of
 this chapter.

(d) Establish a fund for the purposes of this chapter, and transfer from the general fund to such fund such moneys as the board deems necessary.

(e) Incur, in the manner provided by law, a bonded indebtedness on behalf of the county for any of the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Join with any incorporated city in the county in the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter and to that end hold jointly with such city all property acquired, and expend money in conjunction with such city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 77.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 6. VETERANS BUILDINGS, MEMORIALS, AND CEMETERIES [1170. - 1480.]



CHAPTER 1. Memorial Districts [1170. - 1259.]



  ARTICLE 1. Formation [1170. - 1185.]

1170.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates:

(a) “District” means a memorial district organized under the provisions of this chapter.

(b) “Board” means the board of directors of a memorial district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 69.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1171.

A memorial district may be established, maintained, governed, supported, and operated in the manner and for the purposes herein provided, and may exercise the powers and jurisdiction herein expressly granted or necessarily implied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 600.)
-------------------------------------------

1172.

No district shall include territory not wholly in the same county. A district may include any incorporated territory of the county together with any contiguous unincorporated territory thereof, or may be formed entirely of contiguous incorporated territory or entirely of contiguous unincorporated territory.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1173.

By petition filed with the county clerk, registered electors residing within the boundaries of a proposed district, equal in number to at least eight per cent of the number of votes cast in the proposed district for the office of Governor at the last general election at which a Governor was elected, may propose the formation of a district. If both incorporated and unincorporated territory are included within the proposed district, the petition shall be signed by registered electors equal in number in each territory to at least eight per cent of the votes so cast therein for Governor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.

The petition shall be addressed to the board of supervisors of the county within which the proposed district is situated, shall be signed by the number of qualified registered voters specified in section 1173, and shall propose and set forth:

(a) The formation of a district under this chapter.

(b) The calling by the board of supervisors of a special election to vote upon the question whether the proposed district shall be formed and to elect the first board of directors of the district.

(c) The name of the proposed district, as “____ memorial district.”

(d) An accurate description of the boundaries of the proposed district specifying what portion of the territory is incorporated territory and what portion unincorporated territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 70.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1175.

The petition may be filed in sections, each of which shall fully comply with all of the requirements for a petition, except that each section need not contain the total number of signatures required for a petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1176.

Within 30 days after the filing of the petition the county elections official shall find and certify whether the petition is signed by the requisite number of qualified registered voters of the proposed district and of the incorporated and unincorporated portions thereof and shall present the petition with the certificate of their findings attached thereto to the board of supervisors at its first regular meeting held 10 days from the date of certification of the petition. The board shall fix a time and place for the hearing of the petition not less than 20 days nor more than 40 days after the date of the meeting, and shall direct the clerk of the board to publish a notice once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper
 circulated in the territory that it is proposed to organize into a district, and that the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 104.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.

If the petition and certificate is presented to the board of supervisors at a regular meeting the board at that meeting shall ascertain whether the petition in all respects complies with the requirements therefor, except that the certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the sufficiency of the signatures to the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.5.

The notice required in Section 1176 shall state the fact that the board has fixed the time and place, which shall be stated in the notice, for a hearing on the matter of the formation of a memorial district. The notice shall describe the territory or shall specify the exterior boundaries of the territory proposed to be organized into a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

1177.6.

At any time prior to the time fixed for a hearing of the matter, any person interested may file with the clerk of the board written objections to the formation of the district. At the time and place fixed for the hearing or at any time to which the hearing may be continued, the board of supervisors shall consider and pass on all objections to the creation of a district, or to the inclusion of any territory in the district. At the hearing, the board of supervisors may exclude any territory that in the opinion of the board would not be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of supervisors shall either adopt an order abandoning the creation of the proposed district or shall by resolution call a special election to vote upon the question of formation of the proposed district and to elect the members of the first board of directors thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 909.)
-------------------------------------------

1178.5.

Sample ballots shall be printed and mailed, together with a synopsis of the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing at Section 1170) of Division 6, to each registered voter in the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 893.)
-------------------------------------------

1179.

The special election shall be held upon a date not later than the 130th day after the meeting of the board at which the petition was presented. At the special election, the proposition submitted shall be “Shall the proposed ____ memorial district be formed?” There shall be elected at the same election a board of directors consisting of five members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

The special election shall be called, noticed, held, and conducted, election officers appointed, voting precincts designated, candidates nominated, ballots printed, polls opened and closed, ballots counted and returned, returns canvassed, results declared, certificates of election issued, oaths of office administered, and all other proceedings incidental to and connected with the election shall be regulated and done, in accordance with the provisions of law regulating elections conducted pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.1.

Within five days after the district formation election has been called, the legislative body which has called the election shall transmit, by registered mail, a written notification of the election call to the executive officer of the local agency formation commission of the county or principal county in which the territory or major portion of the territory of the proposed district is located. Such written notice shall include the name and a description of the proposed district, and may be in the form of a certified copy of the resolution adopted by the legislative body calling the district formation election.

The executive officer, within five days after being notified that a district formation election has been called, shall submit to the commission, for its approval or modification, an impartial analysis of the proposed district formation. 

The impartial analysis shall not exceed 500 words in length and shall include a specific description of the boundaries of the district proposed to be formed. 

The local agency formation commission, within five days after the receipt of the executive officer’s analysis, shall approve or modify the analysis and submit it to the officials in charge of conducting the district formation election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 736.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.2.
